Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6123.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 143. Every month, the state treasurer shall determine the total amount of funds described in section 142(1)(a) and (b), as applicable. The state treasurer shall provide the amounts to the appropriations committees, the senate and house of representatives appropriations subcommittees on agriculture and rural development, the fiscal agencies, the senate and house of representatives policy offices, and the state budget office. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S03895'25) or House Bill No. 6122 (request no. H03895'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.